Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 414.590 is amended to read:
414.590. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Benefit period” means a period of time, shorter than the [ five-year] contract term, for which
specific terms and conditions in a contract between a coordinated care organization and  the Oregon
Health Authority are in effect.
(b) “Renew” means an agreement by a coordinated care  organization to amend the terms or
conditions of an existing contract for the next benefit period.
(2) A contract entered into  between the authority and a coordinated care organization under
ORS 414.572 (1):
(a) Shall be :
(A) For [ a] an initial term of no less than  five years;  and
(B) The same length for all coordinated care organizations  contracting with the author-
ity;
(b) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, may not be amended more than once in
each 12-month period; and
(c) May be  terminated by the authority if a coordinated care organization fails to meet outcome
and quality measures specified in the contract or is otherwise in breach of the contract.
(3) This section does not prohibit the  authority from allowing a coordinated care organization
a reasonable amount of time in which to cure any  failure to meet outcome and quality measures
specified in the contract prior to the termination of the contract.
(4) A  contract entered into between the authority and a coordinated care organization may be
amended:
(a) More than once in each 12-month period if:
(A) The authority and the coordinated care organization mutually agree to amend  the contract;
or
(B) Amendments are necessitated by changes in federal or state law.
(b) Once within the first eight  months of the effective date of the contract if needed to adjust
the global budget of a  coordinated care organization, retroactive to the beginning of the calendar
year, to take into account changes in the  membership of the coordinated care organization or the
health status of the coordinated care organization’s members.
Enrolled House Bill 2205 (HB 2205-A) Page 1
(5) Except as provided in  subsection (8) of this section, the authority must give a coordinated
care organization at least 60 days’ advance notice of  any amendments the authority proposes to
existing contracts between the authority and the coordinated care organization.
(6) Except as  provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, an amendment to a contract may apply
retroactively only if:
(a) The amendment does  not result in a claim by the authority for the recovery of amounts paid
by the authority to the coordinated care organization prior to the date of the amendment; or
(b) The Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services notifies  the authority, in writing, that the
amendment is a  condition for approval of the contract by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services.
(7) If an amendment to a contract under subsection  (6)(b) of this section or other circumstances
arise that result  in a claim by the authority for the recovery of amounts previously paid to a coor-
dinated care organization by the authority, the authority shall  ensure that the recovery does not
have a material adverse effect on the coordinated  care organization’s ability to maintain the re-
quired minimum amounts of risk-based capital.
(8) No later than  134 days prior to the end of a benefit period, the authority shall provide to
each coordinated care organization notice of the proposed changes to the  terms and conditions of
a contract, as will be submitted to the Centers for Medicare and  Medicaid Services for approval, for
the next benefit period.
(9) A coordinated care organization must notify the authority of  the coordinated care
organization’s refusal to renew a contract with the authority no later than 14  days after the au-
thority provides the notice described  in subsection (8) of this section. Except as provided in sub-
sections (10) and (11) of this section, a refusal  to renew terminates the contract at the end of the
benefit period.
(10) The authority may require  a contract to remain in force into the next benefit period and
be amended as proposed by the authority until 90 days after the coordinated care  organization has,
in accordance with criteria prescribed by the authority:
(a) Notified each of its members and contracted providers of the termination of the contract;
(b) Provided to the authority a plan to  transition its members to another coordinated care or-
ganization; and
(c) Provided to the authority a plan for closing out its coordinated care organization business.
(11) The authority may waive compliance with the deadlines in subsections (9) and (10)  of this
section if the Director of the Oregon Health Authority  finds that the waiver of the deadlines is
consistent with the effective and efficient administration of the medical assistance program  and the
protection of medical assistance recipients.
SECTION 2.
 Section 2, chapter 441, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  [ Notwithstanding ORS 414.590 (2)(a), ] A contract entered into between the Oregon
Health Authority and a coordinated care organization under ORS 414.572 (1) that is in effect  on [ the
effective date of this 2023 Act ] July 27, 2023, shall be extended to December 31, 2026 , unless further
extended by the authority .
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 414.590 by section 1 of this 2025  Act apply to con-
tracts between the Oregon Health Authority and a  coordinated care organization that are in
effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act or that  are entered into, amended or renewed
on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2205 (HB 2205-A) Page 2
Passed by House April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2205 (HB 2205-A) Page 3